test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-rikaaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - rikāz: # adjectives 171 'eng rich /est rikas/fin' - full paradigm
     rikāz+A+Sg+Nom: rikāz
     rikāz+A+Sg+Gen: rikkõ
     rikāz+A+Sg+Par: rikāzt
     rikāz+A+Sg+Dat: rikkõn
     rikāz+A+Sg+Ins: rikkõks
     rikāz+A+Sg+Ill: [rikkõ, rikkõz]
     rikāz+A+Sg+Ela: rikāst
     rikāz+A+Pl+Nom: rikkõd
     rikāz+A+Pl+Gen: rikkõd
     rikāz+A+Pl+Par: rikīdi
     rikāz+A+Pl+Dat: rikkõdõn
     rikāz+A+Pl+Ins: rikkõdõks
     rikāz+A+Pl+Ill: rikīž
     rikāz+A+Pl+Ela: rikīst
